Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Exempt Religious and Other Private Schools.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A private school that accepts no state or federal funding is not required to obtain an educational certification from the Alaska Department of Education to be designated an exempt private school. Jan. 1, 1990 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.45.100.
Exemption.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a religious or other private school that complies with AS

14.45.100

—

14.45.130

is exempt from other provisions of law and regulations relating to education except law and regulations relating to physical health, fire safety, sanitation, immunization, and physical examinations.

A religious or other private school that is exempt under this section is not required to comply with AS

14.33.120(b)

,

14.33.125

, or

14.33.127

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 11 SLA 1984; am §§ 4, 5 ch 95 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For private schools, see 4 AAC 42.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 14, 2014, added “Except as provided in (b) of this section, a” at the beginning, and made a related change; added (b).

Opinions of attorney general. —

The State Board of Education has statutory authority to adopt regulations concerning corporal punishment of students in private schools to the extent necessary to protect the physical health and safety of the children. April 1, 1988 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.45.110.
Requirements of exempt schools.

The parent or guardian of a child of compulsory school age enrolled in a religious or other private school that complies with AS

14.45.100

—

14.45.130

shall file an annual notice of enrollment in the school for the child with the local public school superintendent for the area in which the child resides on a form provided by the department. The form shall be signed by the parent or guardian and the chief administrative officer of the school and returned to the local public school superintendent by the parent or guardian. The school shall notify the local public school superintendent within a reasonable time if the child is no longer enrolled in or attending the school.

A religious or other private school that elects to comply with AS

14.45.100

—

14.45.130

shall maintain monthly attendance records for each student enrolled in the school, shall operate on a regular schedule, excluding reasonable holidays and vacations, during at least 180 days of the year, shall make an annual report to the commissioner of the number of students in each grade and the school calendar, and shall comply with the provisions concerning missing children under AS

14.30.700

—

14.30.720

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 11 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 202 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For provisions establishing school age, see AS

14.30.010

.

Sec. 14.45.120.
Standardized testing requirements.

A religious or other private school that elects to comply with AS

14.45.100

—

14.45.130

shall administer a nationally standardized test selected by the chief administrative officer of the school to all students enrolled in grades four, six, and eight at least once each school year.

The nationally standardized test must measure achievement in English grammar, reading, spelling, and mathematics.

A religious or other private school that elects to comply with AS

14.45.100

—

14.45.130

shall maintain records of the results of the nationally standardized tests and the records shall be made available to the parent or guardian of the student. Each school shall make composite test results for the school available annually to an authorized representative of the department. The composite test results of a religious or other private school operated in compliance with AS

14.45.100

—

14.45.130

are not public information unless each public school

is also required to administer a nationally standardized test that measures achievement in English grammar, reading, spelling, and mathematics; and

the composite test results for each public school are public information.

History.

(§ 5 ch 11 SLA 1984)

Sec. 14.45.130.
Records.

A religious or other private school that elects to comply with AS

14.45.100

—

14.45.130

shall maintain permanent student records reflecting immunizations, physical examinations, standardized testing, academic achievement, courses taken at the school, and level of eligibility for an Alaska performance scholarship under AS

14.43.810

—

14.43.849

.

The chief administrative officer of a school that elects to comply with AS

14.45.100

—

14.45.130

shall certify to the department, under oath or by affirmation, that the records required under (a) of this section are being maintained.

History.

(§ 5 ch 11 SLA 1984; am § 7 ch 14 SLA 2010; am § 12 ch 74 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in the text of the amendment of (a) of this section effective July 1, 2011, “AS

14.43.849

” was substituted for “AS 14.43.850” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 14.43.850.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2011, added “level of eligibility for an Alaska merit scholarship program scholarship under AS

14.43.810

— 14.43.850” and made a related change.

The 2012 amendment, effective September 14, 2012, in (a), substituted “Alaska performance scholarship” for “Alaska merit scholarship program scholarship”.